apertium-ita.ita.dix
<pardef n="cred/ere__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>eremmo</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erei</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ereste</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eresti</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erebber</l>   <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erebbero</l>  <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erebbe</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eremo</l>     <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erò</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erete</l>     <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erai</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eran</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eranno</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erà</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>endo</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>endo</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emmo</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ei</l>        <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>etti</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>este</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esti</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erono</l>     <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettero</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ette</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iamo</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iamo</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantiamo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>an</l>        <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ano</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>        <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ere</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evamo</l>     <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evo</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evate</l>     <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evi</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evan</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evano</l>     <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eva</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>essimo</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>essi</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>este</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>essi</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esser</l>     <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>essero</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esse</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ute</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ute</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantate"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uta</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uta</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantata"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uti</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uti</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantati"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uto</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uto</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantato"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iamo</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>on</l>        <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ono</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iamo</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iate</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>an</l>        <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ano</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    

<e lm="credere">         <i>cred</i><par n="cred/ere__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="godere">          <i>god</i><par n="cred/ere__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rivedere">        <i>rived</i><par n="cred/ere__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stragodere">      <i>stragod</i><par n="cred/ere__vblex"/></e>
